Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1091
Receivers; disobedience of orders; punishment; sheriff may act.

Whenever, in the exercise of their authority, the court or judge shall have ordered the deposit or delivery of money or other things, and the order is disobeyed, the court or judge, in addition to punishing such disobedience as for contempt, may make an order requiring the sheriff to take the money or thing, and deposit or deliver it, in conformity with the direction of the court or judge.

R.S.1867, Code § 276, p. 439;

Laws 1899, c. 82, § 1, p. 337;

R.S.1913, § 7820;

C.S.1922, § 8764;

C.S.1929, § 20-1091;

R.S.1943, § 25-1091.